Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.434

Inspections and investigations necessary to adopt or enforce rules—Director's duties—Fees—Waiver of provisions during state of emergency.

(1) The director or the director's authorized representative may conduct such inspections, investigations, and audits as may be necessary to adopt or enforce manufactured and mobile home, commercial coach, conversion vending units, medical units, recreational vehicle, park trailer, factory built housing, and factory built commercial structure rules adopted under the authority of this chapter or to carry out the director's duties under this chapter.

(2) For purposes of enforcement of this chapter, persons duly designated by the director upon presenting appropriate credentials to the owner, operator, or agent in charge may:

(a) At reasonable times and without advance notice enter any factory, warehouse, or establishment in which manufactured and mobile homes, commercial coaches, conversion vending units, medical units, recreational vehicles, park trailers, factory built housing, and factory built commercial structures are manufactured, stored, or held for sale;

(b) At reasonable times, within reasonable limits, and in a reasonable manner inspect any factory, warehouse, or establishment as required to comply with the standards adopted by the secretary of housing and urban development under the national manufactured home construction and safety standards act of 1974. Each inspection shall be commenced and completed with reasonable promptness; and

(c) As requested by an owner of a conversion vending unit or medical unit, inspect an alteration.

(3) For purposes of determining compliance with this chapter's permitting requirements for alterations of mobile and manufactured homes, the department may audit the records of a contractor as defined in chapter 18.27 RCW or RCW 18.106.020(1) or an electrical contractor as defined in RCW 19.28.006 when the department has reason to believe that a violation of the permitting requirements has occurred. The department shall adopt rules implementing the auditing procedures. Information obtained from a contractor through an audit authorized by this subsection is confidential and not open to public inspection under chapter 42.56 RCW.

(4) The department shall set a schedule of fees by rule which will cover the costs incurred by the department in the administration of RCW 43.22.335 through 43.22.490, and is hereby authorized to do so pursuant to RCW 43.135.055. The department shall use fees set under this subsection only for the administration of RCW 43.22.335 through 43.22.490. The department may waive mobile/manufactured home alteration permit fees for indigent permit applicants.

(5) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12), the governor may waive or suspend the collection of fees under this section or any portion of this section or under any administrative rule, and issue any orders to facilitate the operation of state or local government or to promote and secure the safety and protection of the civilian population.

[ 2008 c 285 s 4; 2008 c 181 s 203; 2005 c 274 s 296; 2004 c 137 s 1; 2003 c 67 s 1. Prior: 2002 c 268 s 3; 2002 c 268 s 2; 2001 c 335 s 5; 1999 c 22 s 10; 1995 c 280 s 5; 1977 ex.s. c 21 s 5.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2008 c 181 s 203 and by 2008 c 285 s 4, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Intent—2008 c 285: "To protect taxpayers, many state programs require the costs of licensing, registration, certification, and related government services to be borne by the profession or industry that uses the services, rather than by the taxpaying public as a whole. State standards that govern the professional duties of these industries are intended to protect the general public by safeguarding health, safety, employees, and consumers. The legislative approval of the fees and fee increases in this act is intended to ensure that the general public is not assessed these costs while also providing adequate funding to statutory programs that safeguard and improve Washington's health, safety, employees, and consumers." [ 2008 c 285 s 1.]

Captions not law—2008 c 285: "Captions used in this act are not any part of the law." [ 2008 c 285 s 31.]

Effective date—2008 c 285: "Except for sections 2 and 15 through 26 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 31, 2008]." [ 2008 c 285 s 32.]

Part headings not law—2008 c 181: See note following RCW 43.06.220.

Effective date—2004 c 137: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect March 31, 2004." [ 2004 c 137 s 2.]

Purpose—Finding—2002 c 268: "The purpose of this act is to implement the recommendations of the joint legislative task force created by chapter 335, Laws of 2001. The legislature recognizes the need to improve communications among mobile/manufactured homeowners, regulatory agencies, and other interested parties, to streamline the complex regulatory environment and inflexible enforcement system, and to promote problem solving at an early stage. To assist in achieving these goals, the legislature:

(1) Encourages the relevant agencies to conduct a pilot project that tests an interagency coordinated system for processing permits for alterations or repairs of mobile and manufactured homes; and

(2) Recognizes the task force's work in reviewing agency rules related to alteration permit requirements and supports the task force's recommendations to the agency regarding those rules. The legislature finds that assisting consumers to understand when an alteration of a mobile or manufactured home is subject to a permit, and when it is not, will improve compliance with the agency rules and further the code's safety goals." [ 2002 c 268 s 1.]

Effective date—2002 c 268: "Sections 1, 2, and 4 through 9 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately [March 29, 2002]." [ 2003 c 67 s 2; 2002 c 268 s 10.]

Application—2001 c 335: See note following RCW 43.22.335.

Construction—1977 ex.s. c 21: See note following RCW 43.22.431.